Maryland, session 2025, SB0135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
15–117.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FIDUCIARY” INCLUDES AN AGENT, AS DEFINED IN §
17–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0135*

SENATE BILL 135
(B) (1) UNLESS WAIVED BY THE CLIENT, A COMMUNICATION BETWEEN
AN ATTORNEY AND A CLIENT THAT ACTS AS A FIDUCIARY IS SUBJECT TO THE
ATTORNEY–CLIENT PRIVILEGE EVEN IF FIDUCIARY FUNDS ARE USED TO
COMPENSATE THE ATTORNEY FOR LEGAL SERVICES RENDERED TO THE CLIENT.
(2) THE EXISTENCE OF A FIDUCIARY RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN A
FIDUCIARY AND A BENEFICIARY DOES NOT CONSTITUTE OR GIVE RISE TO A WAIVER
OF THE ATTORNEY–CLIENT PRIVILEGE FOR COMMUNICATIONS BETWEEN THE
ATTORNEY AND THE FIDUCIARY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.